Utah statutes.
62A-3-309.   Enforcement by division -- Duty of county or district attorney.

(1)  It is the duty of the county or district attorney, as appropriate under Sections 17-18a-202 and 17-18a-203, to:

(a)  assist and represent the division;

(b)  initiate legal proceedings to protect vulnerable adults; and

(c)  take appropriate action to prosecute the alleged offenders.

(2)  If the county or district attorney fails to act upon the request of the division to provide legal assistance within five business days after the day on which the request is made:

(a)  the division may request the attorney general to act; and

(b)  the attorney general may, in the attorney general's discretion, assume the responsibilities and carry the action forward in place of the county or district attorney.



Amended by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

